Indiana, session 2026, SB269.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 20-26-22 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 22. Youth Peer Support Program
Sec. 1. The following definitions apply throughout this chapter:
(1) "Approved postsecondary educational institution" has the
meaning set forth in IC 21-7-13-6(a).
(2) "Local mental health organization" means a nonprofit
entity that:
(A) provides mental health education, prevention,
navigation, or peer support services;
(B) serves the geographic region of the participating
school; and
(C) maintains a physical or operational presence within the
school's service area.
(3) "Online mental health screening" means a validated,
confidential, web based mental health screening tool that
2026 IN 269—LS 7027/DI 143


provides individualized feedback and referral guidance.
(4) "Youth peer support program" means non-clinical, peer
to peer support provided by trained students with lived
experiences concerning mental health and substance abuse,
operating within a clearly defined scope of practice and under
appropriate supervision.
Sec. 2. (a) A school corporation may establish a youth peer
support program for students in grade 6 through grade 12.
(b) A youth peer support program established under subsection
(a) must:
(1) be developed in consultation with one (1) or more local
mental health organizations serving the school's geographic
area;
(2) utilize evidence based training models approved by the
department;
(3) include written referral protocols to school based and
community based mental health services;
(4) provide ongoing supervision by a school counselor, school
social worker, licensed mental health professional, or
qualified community partner; and
(5) include safeguards to protect student confidentiality and
well-being.
(c) A youth peer support program established under subsection
(a) may not:
(1) provide clinical diagnosis or treatment;
(2) be established to replace school counselors or mental
health professionals; or
(3) require participation by a student.
(d) Youth peer supporters participating in a youth peer support
program established under subsection (a) must receive training
delivered or endorsed by an approved postsecondary educational
institution or offered in partnership with an approved
postsecondary educational institution.
Sec. 3. (a) A school corporation shall provide students in grade
7, grade 9, and grade 11 with access to voluntary, confidential,
online mental health screenings at least once per school year.
(b) The parent of a student enrolled in a school corporation shall
receive an annual notification of:
(1) the availability and purpose; and
(2) the relevant data privacy protections;
associated with the screening described in subsection (a).
(c) The result of a screening described in subsection (a):
2026 IN 269—LS 7027/DI 143


(1) is confidential;
(2) may not be placed in a student's cumulative educational
record;
(3) may only be used to offer voluntary referrals to local
mental health organizations; and
(4) is not considered an educational record within the
meaning of the federal Family Educational Rights and
Privacy Act (20 U.S.C. 1232).
(d) A school corporation shall develop and implement a policy
to assist students.
Sec. 4. (a) A school corporation that establishes a youth peer
support program under section 2 of this chapter shall do the
following:
(1) Prioritize non-exclusive partnerships with local or regional
organizations.
(2) Submit an annual report to the department that
aggregates non-identifying data concerning the:
(A) number of screenings described under section 3(a) of
this chapter that have been completed;
(B) number of referrals described under section 3(c)(3) of
this chapter that have been provided; and
(C) youth peer support participation rates.
(b) The department shall compile and publish an annual report
concerning the information submitted to the department under
subsection (a), and submit the report to the general assembly, in an
electronic format under IC 5-14-6, not later than December 1 of
each year.
Sec. 5. (a) The commission on youth peer advisory support is
established.
(b) The commission has the following fourteen (14) members:
(1) The designee of the secretary of education, who serves at
the pleasure of the secretary of education.
(2) Four (4) representatives of Mental Health America, each
representing a different geographic region of Indiana, chosen
by the organization, who serve two (2) year terms.
(3) Two (2) students currently enrolled in a school
corporation, chosen by the secretary of education, who serve
two (2) year terms.
(4) Two (2) mental health professionals employed by a school
corporation, chosen by the secretary of education, who serve
two (2) year terms.
(5) Two (2) parents of students currently enrolled in a school
2026 IN 269—LS 7027/DI 143


corporation, chosen by the secretary of education, who serve
two (2) year terms.
(6) Two (2) representatives of local crisis response or
prevention organizations, chosen by the secretary of
education, who serve two (2) year terms.
(7) One (1) representative from an approved postsecondary
educational institution, chosen by the secretary of education,
who serves a two (2) year term.
(c) Each member of the commission who is not a state employee
is entitled to the minimum salary per diem provided by
IC 4-10-11-2.1(b). A member who is not a state employee is also
entitled to reimbursement for traveling expenses and other
expenses actually incurred in connection with the member's duties,
as provided in the state travel policies and procedures established
by the Indiana department of administration and approved by the
budget agency.
(d) The designee of the secretary of education under subsection
(b)(1) serves as the chairperson of the commission.
(e) The commission shall meet at least biannually on the call of
the chairperson, and may meet as often as is necessary. The
chairperson shall provide not less than fourteen (14) days notice of
a meeting to the members of the commission and to the public.
(f) The affirmative votes of at least seven (7) members of the
commission are necessary for the commission to take action. The
votes of the commission must be recorded.
(g) All commission meetings shall be open to the public, and
each meeting must include opportunities for public comment.
(h) The commission shall provide recommendations to the
general assembly regarding youth peer support programs, youth
peer support certification recommendations, and best practices.
(i) The department shall provide staff support for the
commission.
2026 IN 269—LS 7027/DI 143